Utah statutes.
53A-1a-518.   Regulated transactions and relationships -- Definitions --
Rulemaking.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Charter school officer" means:
(i)  a member of a charter school's governing board;
(ii)  a member of a board or an officer of a nonprofit corporation under which
a charter school is organized and managed; and
(iii)  the chief administrative officer of a charter school.
(b) (i)  "Employment" means a position in which a person's salary, wages, pay,
or compensation, whether as an employee or contractor, is paid from charter
school funds.
(ii)  "Employment" does not include a charter school volunteer.
(c)  "Relative" means a father, mother, husband, wife, son, daughter, sister,
brother, uncle, aunt, nephew, niece, first cousin, mother-in-law, father-in-
law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, son-in-law, or daughter-in-law.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a relative of a charter
school officer may not be employed at a charter school.
(b)  If a relative of a charter school officer is to be considered for
employment in a charter school, the charter school officer shall:
(i)  disclose the relationship, in writing, to the other charter school
officers;
(ii)  submit the employment decision for the approval, by majority vote, to
the charter school's governing board;
(iii)  abstain from voting on the issue; and
(iv)  be absent from any meeting when the employment is being considered and
determined.
(3) (a)  A charter school officer or a relative of a charter school officer
may not have a financial interest in a contract or other transaction involving
a charter school in which the charter school officer serves as a charter
school officer.
(b)  The provisions in Subsection (3)(a) do not apply to a reasonable contract
of employment for:
(i)  the chief administrative officer of a charter school; and
(ii)  the relative of the chief administrative officer of a charter school
whose employment is approved in accordance with the provisions in Subsection
(2).
(4)  The State Board of Education or State Charter School Board may not
operate a charter school.
